New York, session 2025-2026, A7096.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 912 of the education law, as amended by chapter 477 2 of the laws of 2004, is amended to read as follows: 3 § 912. Health and welfare services to all children. The voters and/or 4 trustees or board of education of every school district shall, upon 5 request of the authorities of a school other than public, provide resi- 6 dent children who attend such school with any or all of the health and 7 welfare services and facilities which are made available by such voters 8 and/or trustees or board of education to or for children attending the 9 public schools of the district. Such services may include, but are not 10 limited to all services performed by a physician, physician assistant, 11 dentist, dental hygienist, registered professional nurse, nurse practi- 12 tioner, school psychologist, school social worker or school speech ther- 13 apist, and may also include dental prophylaxis, vision and hearing 14 screening examinations, the taking of medical histories and the adminis- 15 tration of health screening tests, the maintenance of cumulative health 16 records and the administration of emergency care programs for ill or 17 injured students. Any such services or facilities shall be so provided 18 notwithstanding any provision of any charter or other provision of law 19 inconsistent herewith. Where children residing in one school district 20 attend a school other than public located in another school district, 21 the school authorities of the district of residence shall contract with 22 the school authorities of the district where such nonpublic school is 23 located, for the provision of such health and welfare services and 24 facilities to such children by the school district where such nonpublic 25 school is located, for a consideration, no greater than that paid by the EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10725-01-5 A. 7096 2 1 district of residence, to be agreed upon between the school authorities 2 of such districts, subject to the approval of the qualified voters of 3 the district of residence when required under the provisions of this 4 chapter. Every such contract shall be in writing and in the form 5 prescribed by the commissioner, and before such contract is executed the 6 same shall be submitted for approval to the superintendent of schools 7 having jurisdiction over such district of residence and such contract 8 shall not become effective until approved by such superintendent. 9 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of September next 10 succeeding the date on which it shall have become a law.